Maryland, session 2026, HB0868.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY OF MARYLAND,
That the Laws of Maryland read as follows:
Article – Education
7–213.
(A) IN THIS SECTION, “CONSEQUENCES OF A CONVICTION FOR FELONY
MURDER” MEANS THE LEGAL PENALTIES THAT TAKE AWAY AN INDIVIDUAL’S
FREEDOM, RIGHTS, AND ACCESS TO PROGRAMS OR SERVICES AFTER CONVICTION
FOR MURDER IN THE FIRST DEGREE UNDER § 2–201(A)(4) OF THE CRIMINAL LAW
ARTICLE.
(B) THIS SECTION APPLIES ONLY TO BALTIMORE CITY.
EXPLANATION: CAPITALS INDICATE MATTER ADDED TO EXISTING LAW.
[Brackets] indicate matter deleted from exist in g l aw . *hb0868*

HOUSE BILL 868
(C) (1) THE BALTIMORE CITY BOARD OF SCHOOL COMMISSIONERS
SHALL DEVELOP AGE–APPROPRIATE CURRICULUM RESOURCES FOR INSTRUCTION
ON THE CONSEQUENCES OF A CONVICTION FOR FELONY MURDER FOR STUDENTS IN
GRADES 6 THROUGH 8 IN BALTIMORE CITY PUBLIC SCHOOLS.
(2) THE BOARD SHALL DETERMINE THE APPROPRIATE SUBJECT
AREA FOR STUDENTS IN GRADES 6 THROUGH 8 TO INCORPORATE INSTRUCTION ON
THE CONSEQUENCES OF A CONVICTION FOR FELONY MURDER.
(D) BEGINNING IN THE 2027–2028 SCHOOL YEAR, THE BOARD SHALL
DEVELOP AND INCORPORATE INSTRUCTION BASED ON THE CURRICULUM
RESOURCES ON THE CONSEQUENCES OF A CONVICTION FOR FELONY MURDER
DEVELOPED UNDER SUBSECTION (C) OF THIS SECTION.
(E) THE CHIEF ACADEMIC OFFICER SHALL ENSURE THAT EACH STUDENT
IS INSTRUCTED ON THE CONSEQUENCES OF A CONVICTION FOR FELONY MURDER AT
LEAST ONCE DURING GRADES 6 THROUGH 8.
SECTION 2. AND BE IT FURTHER ENACTED, That this Act shall take effect July
1, 2026.